Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2308.03
County highway and city street superintendent licenses; reissuance; renewal.

(1) Beginning on August 28, 2021:

(a) A county highway superintendent license or city street superintendent license, whether of Class A or Class B, issued prior to August 28, 2021, is deemed to be a county highway and city street superintendent license;

(b) The holder of any Class A license or licenses shall have such license or licenses reissued as a single Class A county highway and city street superintendent license;

(c) The holder of any Class A license and any Class B license shall have such licenses reissued as a single Class A county highway and city street superintendent license; and

(d) The holder of any Class B license or licenses who does not hold any Class A license shall have such Class B license or licenses reissued as a single Class B county highway and city street superintendent license.

(2) A license reissued under subsection (1) of this section shall remain on the same triennial renewal cycle as the license or licenses replaced.

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB733, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 11.